Hawaii statutes.
§201B-13 Assistance by state and county
agencies; advisory group. (a) Any state or county agency may render
services upon request of the authority.

(b) The authority may establish an advisory
group that may meet monthly or as the authority deems necessary, which may
include the director of business, economic development, and tourism, director
of transportation, chairperson of the board of land and natural resources, and
executive director of the state foundation on culture and the arts to advise
the authority on matters relating to their respective departments or agency in
the preparation and execution of suggested:

(1) Measures to respond to tourism emergencies
pursuant to section 201B-9;

(2) Programs for the management, improvement, and
protection of Hawaii's natural environment and other areas frequented by
visitors;

(3) Measures to address issues affecting airlines,
air routes, and barriers to travel to Hawaii; and

(4) Programs to perpetuate the cultures of Hawaii and
engage local communities to sustain and preserve the native Hawaiian culture. [L
1998, c 156, pt of §2; am L Sp 2009, c 5, §10]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next